Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-306.5 Residential hurricane
coverage. (a) Upon written request of the commissioner by certified mail,
an insurer writing the peril of residential hurricane coverage in this State
shall within thirty days after receipt of the request, make accessible to the
commissioner or commissioner's designee information verifying that the insurer
has the financial assets and ability to cover its hurricane insurance
exposure. The information to be made accessible shall include:

(1) The aggregate amount of hurricane coverage
premiums and aggregate limits of coverage by type of coverage, which shall be
compiled on a quarterly basis;

(2) The probable maximum loss associated with the
above aggregate limits, assuming the occurrence of a hurricane of a severity unlikely
to occur more frequently than once every one hundred years, as that loss is
estimated in a report prepared by a recognized hurricane modeling company;

(3) All financial information relating to the
insurer's capital base and reinsurance program for hurricane losses, such as:

(A) Information describing the reinsurance
program in place as of the date notice was received;

(B) The names and financial ratings of each
reinsurer;

(C) Aggregate limits of reinsurance coverage
available; and

(D) Reinstatement provisions; and

(4) Any other related information the commissioner
may require to evaluate the adequacy of the program.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the
loss estimated pursuant to subsection (a) exceeds the sum of an insurer's
capitalization and available reinsurance, the commissioner may further examine
that insurer's financial position as allowed by article 2 and commence
supervisory and other appropriate proceedings under article 15.

(c) The cost of an examination under this
section shall be assessed against the insurer being examined and remitted to
the commissioner for deposit into the compliance resolution fund.

(d) Any final order or decision of the
commissioner under this section shall be made pursuant to chapter 91. [L 2001,
c 120, §1; am L 2003, c 212, §24]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next